Hawaii statutes.
[§11-382] Prohibited uses of
campaign funds. Campaign funds shall not be used:

(1) To support the campaigns of candidates other than
the candidate with which they are directly associated;

(2) To campaign against any other candidate not
directly opposing the candidate with which they are directly associated; or

(3) For personal expenses. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next